Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 11 Prevention of Public Offenses
12-12-104. Physical evidence in sex offense or violent offense prosecutions — Retention and disposition — Definitions.

In a prosecution for a sex offense or a violent offense, the law enforcement agency shall preserve, subject to a continuous chain of custody, any physical evidence secured in relation to a trial and sufficient official documentation to locate that evidence.

(1)After a trial resulting in conviction, the evidence shall be impounded and securely retained by a law enforcement agency.

Retention shall be the greater of:

The evidence has no significant value for forensic analysis and must be returned to its rightful owner; or

The evidence has no significant value for forensic analysis and is of a size, bulk, or physical character not usually retained by the law enforcement agency and cannot practicably be retained by the agency.

A person who violates this section is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1780, § 11; 2011, No. 779, § 6; 2017, No. 367, § 11; 2017, No. 664, § 6.

12-12-105. Controlled substance laboratory seizure reports.

Drug paraphernalia or drug precursors that could be utilized in the manufacture of a controlled substance; or

Any laboratory reasonably believed to:

The Arkansas Drug Director shall promulgate rules regarding the distribution of the reports and statistics generated in accordance with the requirements of this section.

For each reported controlled substance laboratory, the Director of the State Crime Laboratory shall record the:

Any discrepancy in the number of reports described in subdivision (e)(1) of this section shall be recorded by the Arkansas Drug Director.

The Arkansas Drug Director shall request completion of a reporting form by any law enforcement agency in the state that has failed to comply with a requirement of subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1873, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 5839.

12-12-106. Investigations of an alleged sex offense.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 676, § 3.

12-12-107. Adult abuse and domestic violence reporting — Definitions.

“Adult” means an individual eighteen (18) years of age or older who is not a maltreated adult under the Adult and Long-Term Care Facility Resident Maltreatment Act, §12-12-1701 et seq.; and

“Health care provider” means a person, corporation, facility, or institution licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized by the law of this state to administer health care in the ordinary course of business or practice of a profession.

Injured adult agrees; or

Health care provider determines that the report is necessary to prevent serious harm to the injured adult.

The county sheriff;

Within a city of the first class, the municipal law enforcement agency; or

The Department of Arkansas State Police.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 1004, § 1.

12-12-108. Domestic violence investigation.

Whether the offender ever used a weapon against the victim or threatened the victim with a weapon;

Whether the offender threatened to kill the victim or victim's children;

Whether the victim believes the offender will try to kill him or her;

Based on the results of the lethality assessment under this section, the law enforcement officer compiling the information required by this section from the victim may refer the victim to an available shelter or domestic violence intervention program and shall comply with §16-90-1107.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 877, § 1.

12-12-109. Domestic violence investigation — Victimless prosecution.

A law enforcement agency that investigates a complaint or accusation of domestic violence shall do so in a manner that allows the prosecuting attorney to prosecute the offense if the prosecuting attorney has probable cause an offense was committed and achieve a guilty verdict based on evidence independent of the testimony of the victim of the offense.

Compliance with this section may be achieved through the collection of evidence, including without limitation:

Witness statements;

Properly obtained statements from the alleged offender;

Medical records;

Photographs or other media;

Other physical evidence; and

Statements from the victim that are exclusions or exceptions to Rule 802 of the Arkansas Rules of Evidence.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 876, § 1.

12-12-110. Missing or unidentified persons — Definitions.

As used in this section:

“Missing person” means a person, including a child under eighteen (18) years of age, reported to a law enforcement agency as missing and unaccounted for from expected and normal activities; and

“Unidentified person” means a person living or deceased who is unidentified after all available methods used to identify a person have been exhausted, including a decedent released to the State Crime Laboratory in which the identity of the decedent cannot be established to the satisfaction of the State Medical Examiner.

(1)To the extent that this section is not duplicative with §12-12-205, the actions under this section shall be undertaken by the law enforcement agency with jurisdiction in the event of a report of a missing person or unidentified person.

Entry of missing person or unidentified person information into the National Missing and Unidentified Persons System does not relieve the obligations of a law enforcement agency under §12-12-205.

A law enforcement agency shall input the following data, if available for an unidentified person, into the National Missing and Unidentified Persons System:

Copies of fingerprints on standardized fingerprint cards measuring eight inches by eight inches (8" x 8") or the equivalent digital image, including partial prints of any fingers;

Forensic dental report or radiology imaging;

Detailed personal descriptions;

Deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) information;

Radiology imaging and medical data; and

All other identifying data, including date and place of death.

When a missing person or unidentified person report is received, a law enforcement agency shall initiate the following procedures within thirty (30) days of receiving the missing person or unidentified person report:

Submit the missing person or unidentified person case to the National Missing and Unidentified Persons System and to any database of missing persons or unidentified persons currently required by the law enforcement agency, providing all appropriate data;

(A)Locate and obtain biometric records, including medical and dental records, medical and dental X-rays, or other medical imaging, and enter those records into the National Missing and Unidentified Persons System.

A law enforcement agency shall not mandate the appearance of a next of kin before initiating a missing persons investigation.

The information contained in a report of a missing person from another law enforcement agency or from a medical examiner shall be available to a law enforcement agency attempting to identify unidentified persons.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 920, § 2.

Subchapter 2

— Arkansas Crime Information Center

12-12-201. Creation — Director.

There is created the Arkansas Crime Information Center, under the supervision of the Supervisory Board for the Arkansas Crime Information Center established by this subchapter.

This center shall consist of the Director of the Arkansas Crime Information Center and such other staff of the Department of Public Safety under the general supervision of the director as may be necessary to administer the services of this subchapter, subject to the approval of funds authorized by the General Assembly.

The board shall name the director in consultation with the Secretary of the Department of Public Safety.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 286, § 1; 1975, No. 742, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1101; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5840.

12-12-202. Supervisory board — Members — Meetings.

There is created a Supervisory Board for the Arkansas Crime Information Center.

The board shall consist of fourteen (14) members:

No member shall continue to serve on the board when the member no longer officially represents the function for which the member was appointed, except the citizens appointed by the Governor, who shall serve for a period of four (4) years.

The board, for cause, may remove any board member and shall notify the Governor of the removal and the reason therefor.

(1)The members of the board may receive expense reimbursement and stipends in accordance with §25-16-901 et seq.

The board members shall receive no other compensation, expense reimbursement, or in-lieu-of payments except as provided in this subsection.

The board shall meet at such times and places as it shall deem appropriate.

A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for transacting any business of the board.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 286, §§ 3-5; 1975, No. 742, §§ 3-5; 1977, No. 542, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-1103 — 5-1105; Acts 1995, No. 1214, § 1; 1997, No. 250, § 66; 1997, No. 1354, § 30; 2001, No. 1288, §§ 3, 4; 2019, No. 910, §§ 5841, 5842.

12-12-203. Supervisory board — Duties.

The duties and responsibilities of the Supervisory Board for the Arkansas Crime Information Center are to:

Maintain and operate the Arkansas Crime Information Center;

Provide that the information obtained by this subchapter shall be restricted to the items specified in this subchapter and so administer the center so as not to accumulate any information or distribute any information that is not specifically approved in this subchapter;

Provide for adequate security safeguards to ensure that the data available through this system are used only by properly authorized persons and agencies;

Provide for uniform reporting and tracking systems to report data authorized by this subchapter. Standard forms and procedures for reporting authorized data under this subchapter shall be prescribed by the board;

Establish such rules and policies as may be necessary for the efficient and effective use and operation of the center under the limitations imposed by the terms of this subchapter;

Provide for the reporting of authorized information under the limitations of this subchapter to the United States Department of Justice under its national system of crime reporting; and

Provide for research and development activities that will encourage the application of advanced technology, including the development of prototype systems and procedures, the development of plans for the implementing of these prototypes, and the development of technological expertise which can provide assistance in the application of technology in record and communication systems in Arkansas.

The board shall establish its own rules for performance of the responsibilities charged to the board in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 286, §§ 3, 5; 1975, No. 742, §§ 3, 5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-1103, 5-1105; Acts 2019, No. 315, §§ 856, 857.

12-12-204. [Repealed.]

There is created a Missing Persons Information Clearinghouse within the Arkansas Crime Information Center.

The clearinghouse shall be administered by the Director of the Arkansas Crime Information Center.

The clearinghouse shall:

Establish a computerized system to communicate information on:

(A)(i)Upon receiving notice of a missing adult, a law enforcement agency shall complete a missing person report and immediately enter identifying and descriptive information about the missing adult into the computerized system of the clearinghouse, provided the entering agency has signed documentation from a family member, friend, or other authoritative source, including a signed report by an investigating official when other documentation is not reasonably attainable, stating the conditions under which the person is declared missing.

A false report of a missing person; or

A false statement in any missing person report.

“Missing adult” means any person:

“Missing child” means any person:

History.

Acts 1985, No. 764, §§ 1-4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-1124 — 5-1127; Acts 1987, No. 485, § 1; 1987, No. 486, § 1; 2001, No. 80, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 858.

12-12-206. Data processing — Supervision.

All data files and computer programs making up the Arkansas Crime Information System, in accordance with this subchapter, shall be under the control and jurisdiction of the Supervisory Board for the Arkansas Crime Information Center.

The Director of the Arkansas Crime Information Center and the board shall make arrangements for the continued use of existing state computer facilities, computer systems and programming personnel, and communications networks whenever feasible and practical.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 286, § 6; 1975, No. 742, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1106.

12-12-207. Maintenance and operation of information system.

The Arkansas Crime Information Center shall be responsible for providing for the maintenance and operation of the computer-based Arkansas Crime Information System.

The use of the system is restricted to serving the informational needs of governmental criminal justice agencies and others specifically authorized by law through a communications network connecting local, county, state, and federal authorities to a centralized state repository of information.

The Supervisory Board for the Arkansas Crime Information Center shall approve the creation and maintenance of each file in the system, establish the entry criteria and quality control standards for each file, and conduct an annual review of the appropriateness and effectiveness of all files and services provided by the center.

(1)The center shall collect data and compile statistics on the nature and extent of crime problems in Arkansas and compile other data related to planning for and operating criminal justice agencies.

The data collected under this subsection shall include the address where a criminal offense occurred.

The center shall also periodically publish statistics and report such information to the Governor, the General Assembly, and the general public.

The center shall be authorized to design and administer uniform record systems, uniform crime reporting systems, and other programs to be used by criminal justice agencies to improve the administration of justice in Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 286, §§ 2, 9; 1975, No. 742, § 2; 1981, No. 612, § 1; 1983, No. 282, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-1102, 5-1102.3, 5-1109, 5-1117; Acts 1993, No. 535, § 6; 1993, No. 551, § 6; 1994 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 37, § 1; 1994 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 38, § 1; 1995, No. 498, § 1; 2019, No. 766, § 1.

12-12-208. Coordination with national crime control information systems.

(1)The Arkansas Crime Information Center shall be the central access and control agency for Arkansas's input, retrieval, and exchange of criminal justice information in the National Crime Information Center or its successor, and the National Law Enforcement Telecommunications System or its successor.

The Arkansas Crime Information Center shall be responsible for the coordination of all Arkansas user agencies with the National Crime Information Center and the National Law Enforcement Telecommunications System.

The Director of the Arkansas Crime Information Center or his or her designee shall serve as the National Crime Information Center control terminal officer and the National Law Enforcement Telecommunications System representative.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 124, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-1102.1, 5-1102.2.

12-12-209. Duty to furnish data.

(1)It shall be the duty of all county sheriffs, chiefs of police, city marshals, correction officials, prosecuting attorneys, court clerks, and other state, county, and local officials and agencies so directed to furnish the Arkansas Crime Information Center all data required by this subchapter.

Upon filing of an order under §5-2-310(b) or an order of commitment entered pursuant to §5-2-314(b), §20-47-214, or §20-47-215 with a circuit clerk or a probate clerk, the circuit clerk or probate clerk shall submit a copy of the order of commitment to the center.

The data shall be furnished to the center in a manner prescribed by the Supervisory Board for the Arkansas Crime Information Center.

A county sheriff, chief of police, city marshal, correction official, prosecuting attorney, court clerk, or other state, county, or local official who knowingly fails to comply with this subchapter or any rule issued by the board carrying out this subchapter upon conviction is guilty of a violation and shall be punished by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).

History.

Acts 1971, No. 286, § 7; 1975, No. 742, §§ 7, 8; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-1107, 5-1111; 2007, No. 463, § 3; 2009, No. 165, § 2.

12-12-210. Special information services agents.

To ensure the accuracy, timeliness, and completeness of all records and information as prescribed by this subchapter, the Director of the Arkansas Crime Information Center shall appoint special information services agents.

After proper and sufficient security clearances and training, the agents shall be commissioned to do monitoring and auditing of all records and information as defined by this subchapter and such other duties as may be prescribed by the Supervisory Board for the Arkansas Crime Information Center.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 742, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1112.

12-12-211. Access to records.

(1)The Arkansas Crime Information Center shall make criminal history records on persons available in accordance with §§12-12-1008 —12-12-1011.

Release of other noncriminal history records shall be in accordance with policies and rules established by the Supervisory Board for the Arkansas Crime Information Center.

(1)The Office of Child Support Enforcement of the Revenue Division of the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a criminal justice agency solely for the purpose of securing information from the center regarding the address or whereabouts of any deserting parent from whom the office is charged with collecting child support.

Any information received by the Crime Victims Reparations Board through the office of the Attorney General obtained from the center pursuant to §16-90-712 shall not be available for examination except by the affected claimant or his or her duly authorized representative.

(A)It shall be unlawful for any person to disclose information obtained under this subsection except:

For the purpose of performing the duties of the:

Office of Child Support Enforcement of the Revenue Division of the Department of Finance and Administration; or

Crime Victims Reparations Board; or

Upon court order.

A constable shall have access to information from the center if the commission certifies that the constable has completed the course required by §14-14-1314.

In that capacity, the State Board of Law Examiners shall require each applicant for admission to the Bar of Arkansas to be fingerprinted.

The center is authorized to accept fingerprints or other information provided to it by the State Board of Law Examiners and is further authorized to release to the State Board of Law Examiners any requested information, including state, multistate, and Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history records, as they may relate to applicants for admission to the bar.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 286, § 2; 1975, No. 742, § 2; 1981, No. 902, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-1102, 5-1118, 5-1119; Acts 1993, No. 605, § 1; 1995, No. 1184, § 29; 1997, No. 243, § 1; 1997, No. 826, § 2; 1999, No. 1224, § 1; 2003, No. 998, § 3; 2007, No. 841, § 1; 2009, No. 476, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 859.

12-12-212. Release or disclosure to unauthorized person — Penalty.

Accesses information or obtains information collected and maintained under this subchapter for a purpose not specified by this subchapter; or

Releases or discloses information maintained under this subchapter to another person who lacks authority to receive the information.

Furthering the commission of a misdemeanor offense or felony offense by the person or another person;

Enhancing or assisting a person's position in a legal proceeding in this state or influencing the outcome of a legal proceeding in this state for the benefit of the person or a member of the person's family;

Causing a pecuniary or professional gain for the person or a member of the person's family; or

History.

Acts 1971, No. 286, § 10; 1975, No. 742, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1110; Acts 1997, No. 826, § 3; 2011, No. 779, § 7; 2011, No. 1224, §
1; 2017, No. 250, § 3; 2017, No. 845, § 2.

12-12-213. Invasion of privacy prohibited.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to give authority to any person, agency, corporation, or other legal entity to invade the privacy of any citizen as defined by the General Assembly or the courts other than to the extent provided in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 286, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1108.